Wisconsin, session 2025, AB492.
do enact as follows:AB492,11Section 1. 15.08 (1m) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB492,3,2215.08 (1m) (b) The public members of the chiropractic examining board, the 3dentistry examining board, the hearing and speech examining board, the medical 4examining board, the naturopathic medicine examining board, the physical therapy 5examining board, the perfusionists examining council, the respiratory care 6practitioners examining council, the board of nursing, the nursing home 7administrator examining board, the veterinary examining board, the optometry 8examining board, the pharmacy examining board, the marriage and family therapy, 9professional counseling, and social work examining board, the psychology 10examining board, and the radiography examining board, and the music therapy 1examining board shall not be engaged in any profession or occupation concerned 2with the delivery of physical or mental health care.AB492,23Section 2. 15.405 (18) of the statutes is created to read:AB492,3,8415.405 (18) Music therapy examining board. There is created a music 5therapy examining board in the department of safety and professional services. 6The music therapy examining board shall consist of 3 members appointed for 7staggered 4-year terms. The music therapy examining board shall consist of 2 8licensed music therapists and one public member.AB492,39Section 3. 440.03 (13) (b) 39. of the statutes is amended to read:AB492,3,1010440.03 (13) (b) 39. Music, art, or therapist.AB492,3,11115g. Art or dance therapist.AB492,412Section 4. 440.03 (14) (a) 1. of the statutes is repealed.AB492,513Section 5. 440.03 (14) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB492,3,2114440.03 (14) (b) A person who is registered under par. (a) shall notify the 15department in writing within 30 days if an organization specified in par. (a) 1. a., 2. 16a. or 3. a. revokes the person’s certification, registration, or accreditation specified 17in par. (a) 1. a., 2. a., or 3. a. The department shall revoke a certificate of 18registration granted under par. (a) if such an organization revokes such a 19certification, registration, or accreditation. If the department revokes the 20certificate of registration of a person who also holds a license granted under the 21rules promulgated under par. (am), the department shall also revoke the license.AB492,622Section 6. 440.03 (14) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB492,4,523440.03 (14) (c) The renewal dates for certificates granted under par. (a) and 24licenses granted under par. (am) are specified in s. 440.08 (2) (a). Renewal 1applications shall be submitted to the department on a form provided by the 2department and shall include the renewal fee determined by the department under 3s. 440.03 (9) (a) and evidence satisfactory to the department that the person’s 4certification, registration, or accreditation specified in par. (a) 1. a., 2. a., or 3. a. has 5not been revoked.AB492,76Section 7. 440.03 (14) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:AB492,4,117440.03 (14) (d) The department shall promulgate rules that specify the 8services within the scope of practice of music, art, or dance therapy that a person 9who is registered under par. (a) is qualified to perform. The rules may not allow a 10person registered under par. (a) to perform psychotherapy unless the person is 11granted a license under the rules promulgated under par. (am).AB492,812Section 8. 440.08 (2) (a) 47b. of the statutes is created to read:AB492,4,1313440.08 (2) (a) 47b. Music therapist: October 1 of each odd-numbered year.AB492,914Section 9. 440.08 (2) (a) 67v. of the statutes is amended to read:AB492,4,1615440.08 (2) (a) 67v. Registered music, art or dance therapist: October 1 of each 16odd-numbered year.AB492,1017Section 10. 440.08 (2) (a) 67x. of the statutes is amended to read:AB492,4,1918440.08 (2) (a) 67x. Registered music, art, or dance therapist with 19psychotherapy license: October 1 of each odd-numbered year.AB492,1120Section 11. 457.02 (6) (b) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB492,4,2321457.02 (6) (b) 1. The person is registered as a music, an art, or dance 22therapist under s. 440.03 (14) (a) and the person holds a valid license granted by the 23department under s. 440.03 (14) (am).AB492,1224Section 12. Chapter 467 of the statutes is created to read:AB492,5,11CHAPTER 467AB492,5,22MUSIC THERAPYAB492,5,33467.01 Definitions. In this chapter:AB492,5,44(2) “Board” means the music therapy examining boardAB492,5,65(4) “Music therapist” means a person licensed as a music therapist under this 6chapter.AB492,5,107(5) (a) 1. “Music therapy” means, subject to par. (b), the clinical and evidence-8based use of music interventions to accomplish individualized goals for persons of 9all ages and ability levels within a therapeutic relationship by a board-certified 10music therapist.AB492,5,11112. “Music therapy” includes, subject to par. (b), all of the following:AB492,5,1412a. Accepting referrals for music therapy services from medical, 13developmental, mental health, or education professionals; family members; clients; 14caregivers; or others involved and authorized with provision of client services.AB492,5,1815b. Conducting a music therapy assessment of a client to determine if 16treatment is indicated. If treatment is indicated, “music therapy” includes 17collecting systematic, comprehensive, and accurate information to determine the 18appropriateness and type of music therapy services to provide for the client.AB492,5,2219c. Developing an individualized music therapy treatment plan for the client 20that is based on the results of the music therapy assessment and that is consistent 21with any other developmental, rehabilitative, habilitative, medical, mental health, 22preventive, wellness care, or educational services being provided to the client.AB492,6,223d. Evaluating the client’s response to music therapy and the individualized 1music therapy treatment plan, documenting change and progress, and suggesting 2modifications, as appropriate.AB492,6,63e. Developing a plan for determining when the provision of music therapy 4services is no longer needed in collaboration with the client, physician, or other 5provider of health care or education for the client, family members of the client, and 6any other appropriate person upon whom the client relies for support.AB492,6,87(b) “Music therapy” does not include the screening, diagnosis, or assessment 8of any physical, mental, or communication disorder.AB492,6,129467.02 License required. (1) (a) Except as provided in par. (b), no person 10may engage in the practice of music therapy, or attempt to do so or make a 11representation as authorized to do so, without a license issued by the board under 12this chapter. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab492 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab492 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB492 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB492 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB492: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting